Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Chapter 99. General Provisions.

Sec. 41.99.010.
Fish and game management and enforcement.

Nothing in this title denies the Department of Fish and Game or the Board of Fisheries and the Board of Game their management and enforcement responsibilities related to the fish and game of this state.

History.

(§ 4 ch 47 SLA 1972; am § 61 ch 21 SLA 1985)

Sec. 41.99.900.
Definitions for title.

In this title, unless the context requires otherwise,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of natural resources;

“department” means the Department of Natural Resources.

History.

(§ 37 ch 85 SLA 1988)